North Carolina, session 2025, HB973.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Statutes are amended by adding a new Chapter to read:
"Chapter 1H.
"Uniform Restrictive Employment Agreement Act.
"§ 1H-1. Title.
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Restrictive Employment
Agreement Act."
"§ 1H-2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Confidentiality agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that:
a. Prohibits a worker from using or disclosing information; and
b. Is not a condition of settlement or other resolution of a dispute.
(2) Electronic. – Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic,
wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.
(3) Employer. – A person that hires or contracts with a worker to work for the
person.
(4) No-business agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that prohibits
a worker from working for a client or customer of the employer.
(5) Noncompete agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that prohibits
a worker from working other than for the employer. The term does not include
a no-business agreement.
(6) Nonsolicitation agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that
prohibits a worker from soliciting a client or customer of the employer.
(7) No-recruit agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that prohibits a
worker from hiring or recruiting another worker of the employer.
(8) Payment-for-competition agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement
that imposes an adverse financial consequence on a worker for working other
than for the employer but does not expressly prohibit the work.
(9) Person. – An individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, or other legal
entity. The term does not include a public corporation or government or
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.
(10) Record. – Information inscribed on a tangible medium or stored in an
electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form.
*H973-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(11) Restrictive employment agreement. – An agreement or part of another
agreement between an employer and worker that prohibits, limits, or sets a
condition on working other than for the employer after the work relationship
ends or a sale of a business is consummated. The term includes a
confidentiality agreement, no-business agreement, noncompete agreement,
nonsolicitation agreement, no-recruit agreement, payment-for-competition
agreement, and training-repayment agreement.
(12) Sale of a business. – Sale, merger, consolidation, or amalgamation of all or
part of a business or nonprofit entity or association, or all or part of its assets,
or of a substantial ownership interest in the entity or association.
(13) Sign. – To, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, execute or
adopt a tangible symbol, or attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(14) Signed agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement signed by the
worker and employer.
(15) Special training. – Instruction or other education a worker receives from a
source other than the employer that is designed to enhance the ability of the
worker to perform the worker's work, is not normally received by other
workers, and requires a significant and identifiable expenditure by the
employer distinct from ordinary on-the-job training.
(16) Stated rate of pay. – The compensation, calculated on an annualized basis, an
employer agrees to pay a worker. The term includes a wage, salary,
professional fee, other compensation for personal service, and the fair market
value of all remuneration other than cash. The term does not include:
a. A healthcare benefit, severance pay, retirement benefit, or expense
reimbursement;
b. Distribution of earnings and profit that is not compensation for
personal service; or
c. Anticipated but indeterminable compensation, including a tip, bonus,
or commission.
(17) Trade secret. – As defined in G.S. 66-152(3).
(18) Training-repayment agreement. – A restrictive employment agreement that
requires a worker to repay the employer for training costs incurred by the
employer.
(19) Work. – Providing service.
(20) Worker. – An individual who works for an employer. The term includes an
employee, independent contractor, extern, intern, volunteer, apprentice, sole
proprietor who provides service to a client or customer, and an individual who
provides service through a business or nonprofit entity or association. The
term does not include an individual, even if the individual performs incidental
service for the employer, whose sole relationship with the employer is (i) as a
member of a board of directors or other governing or advisory board, (ii) an
individual under whose authority the powers of a business or nonprofit entity
or association are exercised, (iii) an investor, or (iv) a vendor of goods.
"§ 1H-3. Scope.
(a) This Chapter applies to a restrictive employment agreement. If a restrictive
employment agreement is part of another agreement, this Chapter does not affect other parts of
the other agreement.
(b) This Chapter supersedes common law only to the extent that it applies to a restrictive
employment agreement but otherwise does not affect principles of law and equity consistent with
this Chapter.
Page 2 House Bill 973-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) This Chapter does not affect an agreement to take an action solely to transfer, perfect,
or enforce a patent, copyright, trade secret, or similar right.
(d) This Chapter does not affect a noncompetition obligation arising solely as a result of
an existing ownership interest in a business entity.
(e) This Chapter does not affect an agreement that requires a worker to forfeit
compensation after the work relationship ends, including vacation or retirement benefits, the right
to which accrued before the work relationship ends.
"§ 1H-4. Notice requirements.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a restrictive employment
agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless:
(1) The employer provides a copy of the proposed agreement in a record to:
a. Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a prospective worker, at least
14 days before the prospective worker accepts work or commences
work, whichever is earlier;
b. A current worker who receives a material increase in compensation, at
least 14 days before the increase or the worker accepts a change in job
status or responsibilities, whichever is earlier; or
c. A departing worker who is given consideration in addition to anything
of value to which the worker already is entitled, at least 14 days before
the agreement is required to be signed.
(2) With the copy of the proposed agreement provided under subdivision (1) of
this subsection, the employer provides the worker in a record the separate
notice, in the preferred language of the worker if available, prescribed by the
North Carolina Department of Labor under subsection (d) of this section;
(3) The proposed agreement and the signed agreement clearly specify the
information, type of work activity, or extent of competition that the agreement
prohibits, limits, or sets conditions on after the work relationship ends;
(4) The agreement is in a record separately signed by the worker and employer
and the employer promptly provides the worker a copy of the signed
agreement; and
(5) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the employer provides an additional
copy of the agreement to the worker, not later than 14 days after the worker,
in a record, requests a copy, unless the employer reasonably and in good faith
is unable to provide the copy not later than 14 days after the request and the
worker is not prejudiced by the delay.
(b) A worker may waive the 14-day requirement of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of
this section if the worker receives the signed agreement before beginning work. If the worker
waives the requirement, the worker may rescind the entire employment agreement not later than
14 days after the worker receives the agreement.
(c) An employer is not required under subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section to
provide an additional copy of the agreement more than once during a calendar year.
(d) The North Carolina Department of Labor shall prescribe the notice an employer must
provide under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section. The notice must inform the
worker, in language an average reader can understand, of the requirements of this Chapter,
including the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and G.S. 1H-5 through G.S. 1H-14
and state that this Chapter establishes penalties against an employer that enters into a prohibited
agreement. The North Carolina Department of Labor shall make the notice available to employers
on its publicly accessible website or in other appropriate ways. The North Carolina Department
of Labor may produce a separate notice for each type of restrictive employment agreement and
translate the notice into languages other than English used by a substantial portion of the State's
labor force.
House Bill 973-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) This section does not apply to a restrictive employment agreement in connection with
the sale of a business of which the worker is a substantial owner and consents to the sale.
"§ 1H-5. Low-wage worker.
A restrictive employment agreement, other than a confidentiality agreement or
training-repayment agreement, is:
(1) Prohibited and unenforceable if, when the worker signs the agreement, the
worker has a stated rate of pay less than the annual mean wage of employees
in this State as determined by the North Carolina Department of Labor; and
(2) Unenforceable if, at any time during the work relationship, the worker's
compensation from the employer, calculated on an annualized basis, is less
than the annual mean wage of employees in this State as determined by the
North Carolina Department of Labor.
"§ 1H-6. Effect of termination of work.
A restrictive employment agreement, other than a confidentiality agreement or
training-repayment agreement, is unenforceable if:
(1) The worker resigns for good cause attributable to the employer; or
(2) The employer terminates the worker for a reason other than misconduct or the
completion of the agreed work or the term of the contract.
"§ 1H-7. Reasonableness requirement.
A restrictive employment agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless it is reasonable.
"§ 1H-8. Noncompete agreement.
A noncompete agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless:
(1) The agreement protects any of the following legitimate business interests:
a. The sale of a business of which the worker is a substantial owner and
consents to the sale;
b. The creation of a business in which the worker is a substantial owner;
c. A trade secret; or
d. An ongoing client or customer relationship of the employer.
(2) When the worker signs the agreement and through the time of enforcement,
the agreement is narrowly tailored in duration, geographical area, and scope
of actual competition to protect an interest under subdivision (1) of this
section, and the interest cannot be protected adequately by another restrictive
employment agreement; and
(3) The prohibition on competition lasts not longer than:
a. Five years after the work relationship ends when protecting an interest
under sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (1) of this section; or
b. One year after the work relationship ends when protecting an interest
under sub-subdivision c. or d. of subdivision (1) of this section but not
an interest under sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (1) of this
section.
"§ 1H-9. Confidentiality agreement.
A confidentiality agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the worker may use and
disclose information that (i) arises from the worker's general training, knowledge, skill, or
experience, whether gained on the job or otherwise, (ii) is readily ascertainable to the relevant
public, or (iii) is irrelevant to the employer's business.
"§ 1H-10. No-business agreement.
A no-business agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the agreement (i) applies
only to a prospective or ongoing client or customer of the employer with which the worker had
worked personally and (ii) lasts not longer than six months after the work relationship between
the employer and worker ends.
"§ 1H-11. Nonsolicitation agreement.
Page 4 House Bill 973-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
A nonsolicitation agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the agreement (i) applies
only to a prospective or ongoing client or customer of the employer with which the worker had
worked personally and (ii) lasts not longer than one year after the work relationship between the
employer and worker ends.
"§ 1H-12. No-recruit agreement.
A no-recruit agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the agreement prohibits hiring
or recruiting only:
(1) Another worker currently working for the employer with whom the worker
had worked personally; and
(2) Lasts not longer than six months after the work relationship between the
employer and worker ends.
"§ 1H-13. Payment-for-competition agreement.
A payment-for-competition agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the agreement
(i) imposes a financial consequence that is not greater than the actual competitive harm to the
employer and (ii) lasts not longer than one year after the work relationship between the employer
and worker ends.
"§ 1H-14. Training-repayment agreement.
A training-repayment agreement is prohibited and unenforceable unless the agreement:
(1) Requires repayment only of the cost of special training;
(2) Lasts not longer than two years after the special training is completed; and
(3) Prorates the repayment for work done during the post-training period.
"§ 1H-15. Nonwaivability.
Except as provided in G.S. 1H-4(b) or in the context of resolving an issue in litigation or
other dispute resolution, a party to a restrictive employment agreement may not waive a
requirement of this Chapter or stipulate to a fact to avoid a requirement of this Chapter.
"§ 1H-16. Enforcement; remedy.
(a) The court may not modify a restrictive employment agreement to make the agreement
enforceable.
(b) A worker who is a party to a restrictive employment agreement or a subsequent
employer that has hired or is considering hiring the worker may seek a declaratory judgment that
the agreement is unenforceable.
(c) In addition to other judicial remedies, a court may award statutory damages under
subsection (e) of this section and in a private action reasonable attorneys' fees to a party that
successfully challenges or defends against enforceability of a restrictive employment agreement
or proves a violation of this Chapter.
(d) An employer seeking to enforce a restrictive employment agreement has the burden
of proving compliance with this Chapter.
(e) An employer that enters a restrictive employment agreement that the employer knows
or reasonably should know is prohibited by this Chapter commits a civil violation. The Attorney
General may bring an action on behalf of the worker, or the worker may bring a private action,
against the employer to enforce this subsection. The court may award statutory damages of not
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per worker per agreement for each violation of this
subsection.
"§ 1H-17. Choice of law; venue.
(a) A choice of law provision that applies to a restrictive employment agreement is
prohibited and unenforceable unless it requires that a dispute arising under the agreement be
governed by the law of the jurisdiction where the worker primarily works for the employer or, if
the work relationship has ended, the jurisdiction where the worker primarily worked when the
relationship ended.
House Bill 973-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A choice of venue provision that applies to a restrictive employment agreement is
prohibited and unenforceable unless it requires that a dispute arising under the agreement be
decided in a jurisdiction where:
(1) The worker primarily works or, if the work relationship has ended, a
jurisdiction where the worker primarily worked when the relationship ended;
or
(2) The worker resides at the time of the dispute.
"§ 1H-18. Uniformity of application; construction.
In applying and construing this Chapter, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity
of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.
"§ 1H-19. Savings provision.
Except as provided in G.S. 1H-20, this Chapter does not affect the validity of a restrictive
employment agreement in effect before the effective date of this Chapter.
"§ 1H-20. Transitional provision.
G.S. 1H-4(a)(4) and (a)(5) apply to a restrictive employment agreement entered into before,
on, or after the effective date of this Chapter.
"§ 1H-21. Severability.
If a provision of this Chapter or its application to a worker or employer is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect another provision or application that can be given effect without the
invalid provision."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
Page 6 House Bill 973-First Edition